Indiana, session 2026, HB1435.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Indiana:
SECTION 1. IC 32-31-8-5 IS AMENDED TO READ AS
FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 5. (a) As used in this
section, "essential services" means:
(1) electrical systems;
(2) plumbing systems;
(3) sanitary systems;
(4) heating, ventilating, and air conditioning systems;
(5) elevators;
(6) appliances; and
(7) doors and windows that lock securely;
needed for the safe and habitable occupation of a rental unit by a
tenant.
(b) As used in this section, "essential system" means a system,
or one (1) or more component parts of a system:
(1) used for; or
(2) necessary to;
the delivery of one (1) or more essential services to a rental unit.
2026 IN 1435—LS 6697/DI 137


(c) A landlord shall do the following:
(1) Deliver the rental premises to a tenant in compliance with the
rental agreement, and in a safe, clean, and habitable condition.
(2) Comply with all health and housing codes applicable to the
rental premises.
(3) Make all reasonable efforts to keep common areas of a rental
premises in a clean and proper condition.
(4) Provide and maintain the following items in a rental premises
in good and safe working condition, if provided on the premises
at the time the rental agreement is entered into:
(A) Electrical systems.
(B) Plumbing systems sufficient to accommodate a reasonable
supply of hot and cold running water at all times.
(C) Sanitary systems.
(D) Heating, ventilating, and air conditioning systems. A
heating system must be sufficient to adequately supply heat at
all times.
(E) Elevators, if provided.
(F) Appliances supplied as an inducement to the rental
agreement.
(4) Provide and maintain all essential systems.
(5) Provide and maintain a rental premises that is free from
the following:
(A) Pests, including rodents and invasive insects.
(B) Mold.
(C) Rot.
(d) Subsection (c)(4) does not:
(1) prohibit a landlord from interrupting, shutting off, or
terminating one (1) or more essential services to a rental unit
as needed:
(A) in an emergency;
(B) to make good faith repairs; or
(C) for construction; or
(2) require a landlord to pay for one (1) or more essential
services provided to a rental unit if the landlord has not
agreed to do so under the rental agreement.
(e) To initiate a request for a repair of an essential system, an
essential service, or a repair under subsection (c), a tenant shall use
the procedure set forth in this subsection. A tenant shall first make
a written or electronic repair request to a landlord. Upon receipt
of a tenant's repair request under this subsection, a landlord shall
provide a written or electronic acknowledgment of the request
2026 IN 1435—LS 6697/DI 137


within twenty-four (24) hours of the receipt of the request. A
tenant's written or electronic request for a repair and a landlord's
written or electronic acknowledgment of a repair request may
include a text message, electronic mail, certified mail, or another
written communication that allows for verification of delivery.
(f) Subject to subsection (g), a landlord shall repair or replace
an essential system not later than seventy-two (72) hours after
being notified by a tenant in accordance with subsection (e) that
the tenant's rental unit is without one (1) or more essential services
as a result of:
(1) a malfunction in the essential system; or
(2) the landlord's failure to otherwise maintain the essential
system in good and safe working condition.
(g) The seventy-two (72) hour period set forth in subsection (f)
does not apply if:
(1) the tenant's rental unit is without one (1) or more essential
services because of a malfunction in an essential system, and
the malfunction is the direct result of the tenant's commission
of waste to the essential system or the rental unit; or
(2) the landlord makes a good faith attempt within the
seventy-two (72) hour period set forth in subsection (f) to
undertake the needed repairs to, or the replacement of, an
essential system through:
(A) the landlord's own efforts; or
(B) the services of:
(i) a contractor; or
(ii) an employee or agent of the landlord;
and the landlord or person described in clause (B) is unable to
begin or complete the needed repairs or replacement within
the seventy-two (72) hour period set forth in subsection (f).
(h) To demonstrate a good faith attempt to address a tenant's
repair request under subsection (e) or for purposes of subsection
(g)(2), a landlord shall provide proof of intention to repair within
seventy-two (72) hours of the tenant's repair request. Proof of
intention to repair may include a quote, confirmation of scheduled
maintenance from a vendor, or confirmation of scheduled
maintenance from the landlord if the landlord performs the repair.
SECTION 2. IC 32-31-8-5.5 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA CODE
AS A NEW SECTION TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE JULY
1, 2026]: Sec. 5.5. (a) To use the procedure established by this
section, a tenant must:
(1) be current on rent payments and have a history of on time
2026 IN 1435—LS 6697/DI 137


payments on the same rental premises for the last six (6)
months; or
(2) have a history of on time payments since the beginning of
the lease if the tenant has rented for less than six (6) months.
(b) In addition to, or instead of, bringing an action under section
6 of this chapter, a tenant may enforce an obligation of a landlord
under this chapter by doing the following:
(1) Notify the landlord, in writing or electronically, after a
seventy-two (72) hour waiting period that:
(A) the landlord has failed to make necessary repairs
under this chapter; and
(B) if the landlord fails to make the necessary repairs
before the tenant's next regular rental payment is due
under the rental agreement, the tenant may petition the
court to deposit rental payments with the clerk of the
court.
The court shall notify the landlord not later than thirty (30)
days after the date the tenant's petition is approved or before
the date that the next rental payment is due, whichever is
earlier. During this time period, the landlord may not file an
action to evict the tenant.
(2) Subject to subsection (c), deposit all rent that is due with
the clerk of the court having jurisdiction in the county where
the rental premises is located if the landlord fails or refuses
to:
(A) make the repairs; or
(B) take the actions necessary to remedy the condition
described in the tenant's notice under subdivision (1);
before the due date of the tenant's next regular rental
payment following delivery of the notice under subdivision
(1).
(3) Apply to the court for an order that directs the landlord to
remedy the condition.
(4) Terminate the rental agreement.
(c) A tenant may not take any action described in subsection
(b)(2), (b)(3), or (b)(4) if the:
(1) tenant does not satisfy the condition required by
subsection (a);
(2) tenant prevents the landlord from having reasonable
access to the rental premises to make any repairs or take any
action necessary to remedy the condition described in the
tenant's notice before the due date of the tenant's next regular
2026 IN 1435—LS 6697/DI 137


rental payment following delivery of the notice under
subsection (b)(1); or
(3) landlord:
(A) owns, manages, or operates not more than four (4)
rental units at any one (1) time; or
(B) occupies one (1) of the living quarters of the rental
premises in a dwelling containing living quarters that are
intended to be occupied by not more than four (4) families
living independently of each other.
(d) A proceeding under this section does not preclude the tenant
or the landlord from enforcing any obligations listed in the rental
agreement.
SECTION 3. IC 32-31-8-6.5 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA CODE
AS A NEW SECTION TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE JULY
1, 2026]: Sec. 6.5. (a) This section applies to an action that is filed
under section 6 of this chapter after June 30, 2026.
(b) During the pendency of an action to which this section
applies, if the tenant continues to occupy the rental unit upon
which the action is based, the court may issue a provisional order
that requires the tenant to make regular rental payments otherwise
due to the landlord under the rental agreement to:
(1) the clerk of the court, who shall hold the payments in trust
for the parties; or
(2) an attorney trust account;
as directed by the court. The funds held by the clerk or in an
attorney trust account under this subsection may not be disbursed
unless the court issues an order for their disbursement.
(c) Subject to subsection (e), if the tenant is the prevailing party
in the action under section 6 of this chapter, the tenant is entitled
to a refund of payments made under an order issued by the court
under subsection (b). The amount of the refund:
(1) shall be determined by the court after taking into
consideration:
(A) the estimated cost of any repairs or other action
necessary to remedy the condition that was the basis of the
tenant's action under section 6 of this chapter;
(B) efforts undertaken by the landlord before or after the
filing of the tenant's action under section 6 of this chapter
to remedy the condition that was the basis of the tenant's
action under section 6 of this chapter; and
(C) any other factors that justice may require; and
(2) shall be disbursed to the tenant upon order of the court.
2026 IN 1435—LS 6697/DI 137


(d) Subject to subsection (e), if the tenant is not the prevailing
party in the action under section 6 of this chapter, the tenant is not
entitled to a refund of any rental payments made under an order
issued by the court under subsection (b), and any amounts held in
trust by the clerk of the court or in an attorney trust account shall,
upon order of the court, be disbursed to the landlord and credited
against the amount of the regular rental payments due to the
landlord under the rental agreement during the pendency of the
action.
(e) The court may reduce the amount to be disbursed to a
landlord in an order under subsection (d), if the court determines
that the landlord's failure to comply with one (1) or more of the
requirements of this chapter contributed in any way to the
necessity of repairs or other action needed to remedy the condition
that was the basis of the tenant's action under section 6 of this
chapter as justice may require.
SECTION 4. IC 32-31-8-8 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA CODE
AS A NEW SECTION TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE JULY
1, 2026]: Sec. 8. (a) If rent is being deposited with the clerk of the
court under section 5.5 or 6.5 of this chapter, the landlord may
apply for the release of rent deposits to the:
(1) clerk of the court on the basis that the condition contained
in the notice is remedied; or
(2) court on the basis that the:
(A) tenant:
(i) did not comply with the notice requirement in section
5.5 of this chapter; or
(ii) was not current on rent payments under the rental
agreement at the time the tenant initiated the rent
deposits with the clerk of the court, as required by
section 5.5(a) of this chapter; or
(B) landlord did not violate an obligation under this
chapter.
(b) The landlord shall name the tenant as a party to an
application filed under this section.
(c) The court shall hold a hearing not more than sixty (60) days
after the application is filed unless, for good cause shown, the court
continues the hearing.
(d) If the court continues a hearing under this section, the court
may, upon the landlord's request, order a release of partial rent
deposits for the following operating costs arising from the rental
premises that is the subject of a proceeding under this chapter:
2026 IN 1435—LS 6697/DI 137


(1) Mortgage payments, including periodic interest payments
on the mortgage.
(2) Insurance premiums.
(3) Real estate taxes.
(4) Utility services.
(5) Repairs.
(e) If the court finds in the landlord's favor after a hearing
under this section, the court shall order the full release of rent
deposits, minus costs, to the landlord.
(f) If the court finds after a hearing under this section that the:
(1) tenant's act or omission caused the condition; or
(2) tenant intentionally acted in bad faith;
the tenant is liable for damages caused to the landlord and costs,
including reasonable attorney's fees.
SECTION 5. IC 32-31-13 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA CODE
AS A NEW CHAPTER TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]:
Chapter 13. Landlord's Required Nexus
Sec. 1. As used in this chapter, "landlord" has the meaning set
forth in IC 32-31-3-3.
Sec. 2. After June 30, 2026, a landlord may not manage a rental
property in Indiana unless one (1) or more of the following apply:
(1) The landlord is authorized to do business in Indiana.
(2) The landlord maintains an office at one (1) or more
physical locations in Indiana.
(3) The landlord appoints an Indiana licensed real estate
broker or broker company to manage the rental property.
2026 IN 1435—LS 6697/DI 137